csv2yaml/yaml_output/VAI_n.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     wanishin+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+NA: wanishinookan
     wanishin+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+NA: wanishinookeg
     wanishin+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+NA: wanishinookang
     wanishin+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+NA: wanishingen
     wanishin+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+NA: wanishingegon
     wanishin+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+NA: wanishinziidaa
     wanishin+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+NA: wanishinin
     wanishin+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+NA: [wanishinog,wanishinok]
     wanishin+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+NA: wanishindaa
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+NA: niwanishinziinaadog
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+NA: giwanishinziimwaadog
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+NA: giwanishinziinaadog
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlObv+NA: [wanishinziidogena',wanishinziidogenan]
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+NA: wanishinziidogenag
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+NA: wanishinziidogenan
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+NA: wanishinziidog
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+NA: niwanishinziiminaadog
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+NA: giwanishinziiminaadog
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+NA: wanishinziimwaadog
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+NA: niwanishininaadog
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+NA: giwanishinimwaadog
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+NA: giwanishininaadog
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObv+NA: [wanishinodogena',wanishinowidogenan]
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+NA: [wanishinowidogenag,wanishinodogenag]
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+NA: [wanishinowidogenan,wanishinodogenan]
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+NA: [wanishinowidog,wanishinodog]
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+NA: niwanishiniminaadog
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+NA: giwanishiniminaadog
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+NA: wanishinimwaadog
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: MISSING
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: MISSING
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: MISSING
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: MISSING
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: wanishinziigwaaban
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: wanishinziinigoban
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: wanishinziigoban
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+NA: MISSING
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+NA: MISSING
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+X+NA: MISSING
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: MISSING
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: MISSING
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: MISSING
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: MISSING
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: wanishinogwaaban
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: wanishininigoban
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: wanishinogoban
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+NA: MISSING
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+NA: MISSING
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+X+NA: MISSING
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+NA: [niwanishinzii,niwanishinziin]
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+NA: giwanishinziim
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+NA: [giwanishinzii,giwanishinziin]
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlObv+NA: [wanishinziiwa',wanishinziiwan]
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+NA: wanishinziiwag
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+NA: wanishinziiwan
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+NA: [wanishinzii,wanishinziin]
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+NA: niwanishinziimin
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+NA: giwanishinziimin
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+NA: wanishinziim
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+NA: niwanishin
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+NA: giwanishinim
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+NA: giwanishin
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+NA: [wanishinoo',wanishinoon]
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+NA: wanishinoog
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+NA: wanishinoon
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+NA: wanishin
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+NA: niwanishinimin
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+NA: giwanishinimin
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+NA: wanishinim
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+NA: niwanishinziinaaban
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+NA: giwanishinziimwaaban
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+NA: giwanishinziinaaban
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObv+NA: [wanishinziibanii',wanishinziibaniin]
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+NA: wanishinziibaniig
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+NA: wanishinziibaniin
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+NA: wanishinziiban
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+NA: niwanishinziiminaaban
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+NA: giwanishinziiminaaban
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+NA: wanishinziimwaaban
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+NA: niwanishininaaban
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+NA: giwanishinimwaaban
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+NA: giwanishininaaban
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObv+NA: [wanishinoobanii',wanishinoobaniin]
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+NA: wanishinoobaniig
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+NA: wanishinoobaniin
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+NA: wanishinooban
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+NA: niwanishiniminaaban
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+NA: giwanishiniminaaban
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+NA: wanishinimwaaban
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+NA: wanishinziiwaanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+NA: wanishinziiwegwen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+NA: wanishinziiwanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlObv+NA: wanishinziinigwen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+NA: wanishinziiwaagwen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+NA: wanishinziinigwen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+NA: wanishinziigwen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+NA: wanishinziiwaangen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+NA: wanishinziiwangen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+NA: wanishinziiwiingen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+NA: wanishinowaanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+NA: wanishinowegwen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+NA: wanishinowanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlObv+NA: wanishininigwen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+NA: wanishinowaagwen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+NA: wanishininigwen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+NA: wanishinogwen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+NA: wanishinowaangen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+NA: wanishinowangen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+NA: wanishinowiingen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: wanishinziiwaambaanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: wanishinziiwegibanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: wanishinziiwambanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: wanishinziinigobanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: wanishinziiwaagobanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: wanishinziinigobanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: wanishinziigobanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+NA: wanishinziiwaangibanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+NA: wanishinziiwangibanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+X+NA: wanishinziiwiingibanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: wanishinowaambaanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: wanishinowegibanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: wanishinowambanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: wanishininigobanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: wanishinowaagobanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: wanishininigobanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: wanishinogobanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+NA: wanishinowaangibanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+NA: wanishinowangibanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+X+NA: wanishinowiingibanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+NA: wanishinziwaan
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+NA: wanishinziweg
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+NA: wanishinziwan
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlObv+NA: wanishinzinig
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+NA: wanishinzigwaa
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+NA: wanishinzinig
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+NA: wanishinzig
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+NA: wanishinziwaang
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+NA: wanishinziwang
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+NA: wanishinzing
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+NA: wanishinaan
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+NA: wanishineg
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+NA: wanishinan
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+NA: wanishininid
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+NA: wanishinowaad
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+NA: wanishininid
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+NA: wanishing
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+NA: wanishinaang
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+NA: wanishinang
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+NA: wanishining
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+NA: wanishinziwaambaan
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+NA: wanishinziwegiban
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+NA: wanishinziwamban
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlObv+NA: wanishinzinigoban
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+NA: wanishinzigwaaban
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+NA: wanishinzinigoban
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+NA: wanishinzigoban
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+NA: wanishinziwaangiban
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+NA: wanishinziwangiban
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+NA: wanishinzingiban
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+NA: wanishinaambaan
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+NA: wanishinegiban
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+NA: wanishinamban
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlObv+NA: wanishininipan
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+NA: wanishinowaapan
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+NA: wanishininipan
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+NA: wanishingiban
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+NA: wanishinaangiban
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+NA: wanishinangiban
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+NA: wanishiningiban
